Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 10.1-1307.02.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Permit for generation of electricity during ISO-declared emergency.

As used in this section:

“Emergency generation source” means a stationary internal combustion engine that operates according to the procedures in the ISO’s emergency operations manual during an ISO-declared emergency.

“ISO-declared emergency” means a condition that exists when the independent system operator, as defined in § 56-576, notifies electric utilities that an emergency exists or may occur and that complies with the definition of “emergency” adopted by the Board pursuant to subsection B.

“Retail customer” has the same meaning ascribed thereto in § 56-576.

The Board shall adopt a general permit regulation for the use of back-up generation to authorize the construction, installation, reconstruction, modification, and operation of emergency generation sources during ISO-declared emergencies. Such general permit regulation shall include a definition of “emergency” that is compatible with the ISO’s emergency operations manual. After adoption of such general permit regulation, any amendments to the Board’s regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section shall be exempt from Article 2 (§ 2.2-4006 et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act.

History.

2009, cc. 752, 855; 2022, c. 356.

§ 10.1-1307.03.
Requirements applicable to Outer Continental Shelf sources.

As used in this section:“Outer Continental Shelf” has the meaning provided by § 2 of the federal Outer Continental Shelf Lands Act (43 U.S.C. § 1331).“Outer Continental Shelf sources” has the same meaning ascribed thereto in § 328(a)(4)(C) of the Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. § 7627(a)(4)(C)).

The Board, by January 1, 2011, shall adopt any regulations necessary to implement and enforce the requirements of § 328 of the Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. § 7627) relating to requirements to control air pollution from Outer Continental Shelf sources located offshore of the Commonwealth. The regulations adopted by the Board shall not differ materially from the regulations promulgated by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency in implementing § 328 of the Clean Air Act.

History.

2010, c. 689.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 689, cl. 2, provides: “That the Department of Environmental Quality shall request the Administrator of the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency to delegate to the Commonwealth any authority the Administrator has under the Clean Air Act to implement and enforce the requirements of § 328 of the Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. § 7627).”

Acts 2010, c. 689, cl. 3, provides: “That the Air Pollution Control Board shall adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2010, c. 689, cl. 4, provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [April 12, 2010].”

§ 10.1-1307.04.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Greenhouse gas emissions inventory.

The Department shall conduct a comprehensive statewide baseline and projection inventory of all greenhouse gas (GHG) emissions and shall update such inventory every four years. The Board may adopt regulations necessary to collect from all source sectors data needed to conduct, update, and maintain such inventory.

The Board shall include the inventory in the report required pursuant to subsection H of §

10.1-1307

, beginning with the report issued prior to October 1, 2022, and every four years thereafter. The Department shall publish such inventory on its website, showing changes in GHG emissions relative to an estimated GHG emissions baseline case for calendar year 2010.

Any information, except emissions data, that is reported to or otherwise obtained by the Department pursuant to this section and that contains or might reveal proprietary information shall be confidential and shall be exempt from the mandatory disclosure requirements of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§ 2.2-3700 et seq.). Each owner shall notify the Director or his representative of the existence of proprietary information if he desires the protection provided pursuant to this subsection.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 98.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 inserted “by the Department” in subsection A; and substituted the first occurrence of “Department” for “Board” in subsection B.

§ 10.1-1307.04.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Greenhouse gas emissions inventory.

The Department shall conduct a comprehensive statewide baseline and projection inventory of all greenhouse gas (GHG) emissions and shall update such inventory every four years. The Board may adopt regulations necessary to collect from all source sectors data needed by the Department to conduct, update, and maintain such inventory.

The Department shall include the inventory in the report required pursuant to subsection H of §

10.1-1307

, beginning with the report issued prior to October 1, 2022, and every four years thereafter. The Department shall publish such inventory on its website, showing changes in GHG emissions relative to an estimated GHG emissions baseline case for calendar year 2010.

Any information, except emissions data, that is reported to or otherwise obtained by the Department pursuant to this section and that contains or might reveal proprietary information shall be confidential and shall be exempt from the mandatory disclosure requirements of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§ 2.2-3700 et seq.). Each owner shall notify the Director or his representative of the existence of proprietary information if he desires the protection provided pursuant to this subsection.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 98; 2022, c. 356.

§ 10.1-1307.05.
Low-emissions and zero-emissions vehicle standards.

As used in this section:“LEV” means low-emission vehicle.“ZEV” means zero-emission vehicle.

The Board may adopt by regulation and enforce any model year standards relating to the control of emissions from new motor vehicles or new motor vehicle engines, including LEV and ZEV standards pursuant to § 177 of the federal Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. § 7507). The Board shall promulgate final regulations for an Advanced Clean Cars Program that includes (i) an LEV program for criteria pollutants and greenhouse gas emissions and (ii) a ZEV program only for motor vehicles with a gross vehicle weight of 14,000 pounds or less. Such programs shall be applicable to motor vehicles beginning with the 2025 model year, or to the first model year for which adoption of such standards is practicable. The Board shall periodically amend any regulations adopted pursuant to this section to ensure continued consistency of such standards with the Clean Air Act.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 263.

The number of this section,

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2021 act having been §

10.1-1307.04

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 263, cl. 2 provides: “That the regulations required to be adopted by the State Air Pollution Control Board pursuant to §

10.1-1307.05

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall be exempt from the requirements of the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq. of the Code of Virginia). Such regulations shall become effective upon filing with the Virginia Registrar of Regulations.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 263, cl. 3 provides: “That the regulations required to be adopted by the State Air Pollution Control Board pursuant to §

10.1-1307.05

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall not become effective prior to January 1, 2024.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 263, cl. 4 provides: “That the State Corporation Commission may exclude energy jurisdictional retail sales related to zero-emission vehicles and hybrid electric vehicles from energy jurisdictional retail sales calculated pursuant to § 56-596.2 of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 263, cl. 5 provides: “That the regulations required to be adopted by the State Air Pollution Control Board (Board) pursuant to §

10.1-1307.05

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall allow any motor vehicle manufacturer to establish a Virginia-specific zero-emission vehicle (ZEV) credit account in the ZEV Credit System and to make a one-time deposit into its account a number of proportional credits equal to its 2025 model year starting California credit balance multiplied by the ratio of the average number of passenger cars and light-duty trucks that a manufacturer produced and delivered for sale in Virginia to the average number of passenger cars and light-duty trucks the manufacturer produced and delivered for sale in California during the time period selected by the manufacturer for calculation of its ZEV requirement for the first effective model year. The deposit shall be made only after all credit obligations for model year 2024 and earlier have been satisfied. While manufacturers may trade or sell these proportional credits to any other manufacturer, these credits may be used to meet up to 18 percent of its ZEV program credit requirements in any model year, unless and until the required regulations are superseded by regulations updating the Advanced Clean Car Program. The Board shall not award or provide any vehicle manufacturer with any other form of ZEV program credits or credit balance prior to the effective date or at the beginning of the compliance period of the regulations required by §

10.1-1307.05

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act. As part of any update to the required regulations to ensure compliance of the ZEV program with the federal Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. § 7401 et. seq.), the Board shall adjust, if necessary, restrictions on the use of the proportional credits remaining in manufacturers’ Virginia accounts in order to ensure that the percentage of ZEVs required to be delivered for sale under Virginia’s ZEV program is approximately equivalent to, but does not exceed, the percentage required under California’s ZEV program, taking into account only existing ZEV credit banks, any changes in restrictions on their use, and the effects of new regulatory requirements on the amount and timing of ZEVs required to be delivered for sale.”

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.

§ 10.1-1307.1.
Department continued; appointment of Director.

The Department of Air Pollution Control is continued as an agency within the Secretariat of Natural and Historic Resources. The Department shall be headed by a Director appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly, to serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

In addition to the powers designated elsewhere in this chapter, the Department shall have the power to:

Administer the policies and regulations established by the Board pursuant to this chapter;

Employ such personnel as may be required to carry out the duties of the Department;

Make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of the Department’s duties and the execution of its powers under this chapter, including, but not limited to, contracts with the United States, other states, agencies, and governmental subdivisions of the Commonwealth;

Accept grants from the United States government and agencies and instrumentalities thereof and any other source. To these ends, the Department shall have the power to comply with such conditions and execute such agreements as may be necessary, convenient, or desirable; and

Perform all acts necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

1990, c. 238.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Secretariat of Natural and Historic Resources” was substituted for “Secretariat of Natural Resources” to conform to Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 401.

§ 10.1-1307.2.
Powers and duties of the Executive Director.

The Executive Director, under the direction and control of the Governor, shall exercise such powers and perform such duties as are conferred or imposed upon him by the law and shall perform such other duties required of him by the Governor and the Board.

The Executive Director may be vested with the authority of the Board when it is not in session, subject to such regulations or delegation as may be prescribed by the Board.In no event shall the Executive Director have the authority to adopt or promulgate any regulation.

In addition to the powers designated elsewhere in this chapter, the Director shall have the following general powers:

Supervise and manage the Department;

Prepare and submit all requests for appropriations and be responsible for all expenditures pursuant to appropriations;

Provide investigative and such other services as needed by the Department to enforce applicable laws and regulations;

Provide for the administrative functions and services of the Department;

Provide such office facilities as will allow the Department to carry out its duties; and

Assist the citizens (including corporate citizens) of the Commonwealth by providing guidelines, time tables, suggestions and in general being helpful to applicants seeking state and federal air pollution control permits.

History.

1990, c. 238.

§ 10.1-1307.3.
Executive Director to enforce laws.

The Executive Director or his duly authorized representative shall have the authority to:

Supervise, administer, and enforce the provisions of this chapter and regulations and orders of the Board as are conferred upon him by the Board;

Investigate any violations of this chapter and regulations and orders of the Board;

Require that air pollution records and reports be made available upon request, and require owners to develop, maintain, and make available such other records and information as are deemed necessary for the proper enforcement of this chapter and regulations and orders of the Board;

Upon presenting appropriate credentials to the owner, operator, or agent in charge:

Enter without delay and at reasonable times any business establishment, construction site, or other area, workplace, or environment in this Commonwealth; and

Inspect and investigate during regular working hours and at other reasonable times, and within reasonable limits and in a reasonable manner, without prior notice, unless such notice is authorized by the Director or his representative, any such business establishment or place of employment and all pertinent conditions, structures, machines, apparatus, devices, equipment, and materials therein, and question privately any such employer, officer, owner, operator, agent, or employee. If such entry or inspection is refused, prohibited, or otherwise interfered with, the Director shall have the power to seek from a court having equity jurisdiction an order compelling such entry or inspection; and

The Executive Director or his duly authorized representative may pursue enforcement action for a violation of opacity requirements or limits based on (i) visual observations conducted pursuant to methods approved by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency, (ii) data from certified continuous opacity monitors, or (iii) other methods approved by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.

5.

Temporarily suspend the enforcement of any regulation or permit requirement applicable to any part of an electrical generation and transmission system, whether owned or contracted for, when a public electric utility providing power within the Commonwealth so requests and has suffered a force majeure event as defined in subdivision 7 of § 59.1-21.18:2.

History.

1990, c. 238; 1995, c. 184; 2007, c. 148.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 148 designated the existing provisions of the section as subsection A; and added subsection B.

§ 10.1-1308.
Regulations.

The Board, after having studied air pollution in the various areas of the Commonwealth, its causes, prevention, control and abatement, shall have the power to promulgate regulations, including emergency regulations, abating, controlling and prohibiting air pollution throughout or in any part of the Commonwealth in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.), except that a description of provisions of any proposed regulation which are more restrictive than applicable federal requirements, together with the reason why the more restrictive provisions are needed, shall be provided to the standing committee of each house of the General Assembly to which matters relating to the content of the regulation are most properly referable. No such regulation shall prohibit the burning of leaves from trees by persons on property where they reside if the local governing body of the county, city or town has enacted an otherwise valid ordinance regulating such burning. The regulations shall not promote or encourage any substantial degradation of present air quality in any air basin or region which has an air quality superior to that stipulated in the regulations. Any regulations adopted by the Board to have general effect in part or all of the Commonwealth shall be filed in accordance with the Virginia Register Act (§ 2.2-4100 et seq.).

Any regulation that prohibits the selling of any consumer product shall not restrict the continued sale of the product by retailers of any existing inventories in stock at the time the regulation is promulgated.

Any regulation requiring the use of stage 1 vapor recovery equipment at gasoline dispensing facilities may be applicable only in areas that have been designated at any time by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency as nonattainment for the pollutant ozone. For purposes of this section, gasoline dispensing facility means any site where gasoline is dispensed to motor vehicle tanks from storage tanks.

No regulation of the Board shall require permits for the construction or operation of qualified fumigation facilities, as defined in §

10.1-1308.01

.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law and no earlier than July 1, 2024, the Board shall adopt regulations to reduce, for the period of 2031 to 2050, the carbon dioxide emissions from any electricity generating unit in the Commonwealth, regardless of fuel type, that serves an electricity generator with a nameplate capacity equal to or greater than 25 megawatts that supplies (i) 10 percent or more of its annual net electrical generation to the electric grid or (ii) more than 15 percent of its annual total useful energy to any entity other than the manufacturing facility to which the generating source is interconnected (covered unit).The Board may establish, implement, and manage an auction program to sell allowances to carry out the purposes of such regulations or may in its discretion utilize an existing multistate trading system.The Board may utilize its existing regulations to reduce carbon dioxide emissions from electric power generating facilities; however, the regulations shall provide that no allowances be issued for covered units in 2050 or any year beyond 2050. The Board may establish rules for trading, the use of banked allowances, and other auction or market mechanisms as it may find appropriate to control allowance costs and otherwise carry out the purpose of this subsection.In adopting such regulations, the Board shall consider only the carbon dioxide emissions from the covered units. The Board shall not provide for emission offsetting or netting based on fuel type.Regulations adopted by the Board under this subsection shall be subject to the requirements set out in §§ 2.2-4007.03, 2.2-4007.04, 2.2-4007.05, and 2.2-4026 through 2.2-4030 of the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.) and shall be published in the Virginia Register of Regulations.

History.

1966, c. 497, §§ 10-17.16, 10-17.18; 1968, c. 311; 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 8; 1970, c. 469; 1972, c. 781; 1973, c. 251; 1980, c. 469; 1984, c. 734; 1988, cc. 26, 891; 1993, c. 456; 1997, c. 55; 2005, c. 66; 2006, c. 71; 2011, c. 393; 2020, cc. 1193, 1194.

Cross references.

As to alternate compliance methods for persons or facilities meeting the criteria for E3 or E4 facilities under §

10.1-1187.3

, see §

10.1-1187.6

. As to regulations promulgated by the State Air Pollution Control Board, see 9 VAC 5-10-10 et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, c. 393, cl. 2, provides: “That by July 1, 2013, the Department of Environmental Quality, in consultation with the Virginia Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, shall conduct enhanced air monitoring at fumigation sites and make its findings available to the Department of Health. The Department of Health shall (i) assess air monitoring data; (ii) determine whether health concerns exist at fumigation sites; and (iii) make recommendations, if necessary, to the fumigation services industry through appropriate trade groups and the Department of Environmental Quality as to whether additional preventative measures are needed to protect public health.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1193 and 1194, cl. 6 provides: “That in developing a plan to reduce carbon dioxide emissions from covered units described in §

10.1-1308

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, the Secretary of Natural Resources and the Secretary of Commerce and Trade, in consultation with the State Corporation Commission and the Council on Environmental Justice and appropriate stakeholders, shall report to the General Assembly by January 1, 2022, any recommendations on how to achieve 100 percent carbon-free electric energy generation by 2045 at least cost for ratepayers. Such report shall include a recommendation on whether the General Assembly should permanently repeal the ability to obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity for any electric generating unit that emits carbon as a by-product of combusting fuel to generate electricity. Until the General Assembly receives such report, the State Corporation Commission shall not issue a certificate of public convenience and necessity for any investor-owned utility to own, operate, or construct any electric generating unit that emits carbon as a by-product of combusting fuel to generate electricity.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1193 and 1194, cl. 11 provides: “That by January 1, 2028, if the Secretary of Natural Resources and the Secretary of Commerce and Trade (the Secretaries) determine that the greenhouse gas reduction targets are not met pursuant to §

10.1-1308

of the Code of Virginia, the Secretaries shall make a recommendation to the Chairs of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce and the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor on the necessity and advisability of a moratorium on the issuance of permits for new fossil fuel-fired generating facilities by January 1, 2030.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1193 and 1194, cl. 13 provides: “That this bill shall be referred to as the Virginia Clean Economy Act.”

The 1997 amendment

inserted the A designator at the beginning of the first paragraph and added subsection B.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 66 substituted language beginning “at a gasoline dispensing facilities . . . ” and ending “motor vehicle tanks from storage tanks” for “shall require the use of such equipment only in areas that have been designated at any time by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency as nonattainment areas for the pollutant ozone” in subsection B.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 71 added subsection B and redesignated former subsection B as subsection C.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 393 added subsection D.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1193 and 1194 are identical, and added subsection E.

§ 10.1-1308.01.
Qualified fumigation facilities.

For the purposes of this section, a “qualified fumigation facility” means a facility that:

Conducts commodity fumigation using any chemical regulated under Section 112(b) of the federal Clean Air Act of foods, products, components, livestock or materials including fumigation subject to regulation by either the U.S. Department of Agriculture or the U.S. Food and Drug Administration, or conducts such fumigation as required by other international, federal, or state regulations or requirements;

Is not otherwise exempt under regulations of the Board for toxic air pollutants;

Has the potential to emit less than 10 tons per year of any hazardous air pollutant or 25 tons per year of any combination of hazardous air pollutants regulated by the Board pursuant to its regulations in Articles 4 (9 VAC 5-60-200 et seq.) and 5 (9 VAC 5-60-300 et seq.) of Chapter 60 (9 VAC 5-60); or is not otherwise subject to regulation under the provisions of the federal Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq.) related to hazardous air pollutants. For determining potential to emit, “facility” means any building, structure, facility or installation that emits or may emit any regulated air pollutant. A facility shall include all of the pollutant-emitting activities that belong to the same industrial grouping, are located on one or more contiguous or adjacent properties, and are under the control of the same person or persons under common control;

Operates in compliance with all federal and state regulations for licensing and operation of fumigation facilities and licensing of fumigant applicators; and

Conducts fumigation activities that are, at a minimum, one of the following:

Performed in buildings or locations within the facility that are no closer than 300 feet from any building, structure, or area not within the facility if such building, structure, or area is regularly occupied by the public. The conditions in this subdivision may be waived or reduced by the Department, in consultation with the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services;

Performed in buildings or containers that are sealed during fumigation and that voluntarily employ capture and control technologies for the fumigant emissions; or

Monitored utilizing equipment and methods recognized by the National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health, or other equipment and methods widely accepted as an industry standard, to ensure the applicable fumigant airborne concentrations referenced in the permissible exposure limits established by the Department of Labor and Industry or the parts per million standard stipulated in the federally approved pesticide labeling, whichever is more stringent, is not exceeded at the fence or property line during active fumigation and fumigation aeration.

The operator of a qualified fumigation facility shall provide to the Department, by first-class mail, facsimile, or electronic mail:

A written notice prior to conducting fumigation activity at the facility that shall include:

Exact physical location at the facility of the particular fumigation operation and distance from any building, structure, or other area regularly occupied by the public;

Object being fumigated (e.g. rail car, truck container, warehouse, bin, storage silo, open pallet of product);

Product being fumigated;

Number of objects and quantity of product being fumigated;

Containment system (e.g. tarp, sealed container);

Fumigant to be used;

Expected quantity of fumigant to be used;

Expected duration of fumigation;

Expected duration of aeration;

Material safety data sheet (MSDS) for fumigant; and

A brief description of capture and control device, if used pursuant to subdivision A 5 b.

Prior to the application of fumigant at the site, a facility shall post visible and legible signs at the facility fence or property line closest to any public right-of-way. The signs shall remain in place until completion of the aeration process and shall conform to the format for placards mandated by the federally approved fumigant label.

In-transit fumigations where the planned aeration is scheduled to occur outside of the Commonwealth are not subject to Board regulations.

2.

A written report completed within four business days following the completion of the fumigation activity that shall include:

a.

Total quantity of fumigant actually used;

b.

Actual duration of aeration; and

c.

Monitoring results for fumigation operations conducted pursuant to subdivision A 5 c.

History.

2011, c. 393.

Editor’s note.

For section 112(b) of the federal Clean Air Act, referred to above, see 42 U.S.C.S. § 7412(b).

Acts 2011, c. 393, cl. 2, provides: “That by July 1, 2013, the Department of Environmental Quality, in consultation with the Virginia Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, shall conduct enhanced air monitoring at fumigation sites and make its findings available to the Department of Health. The Department of Health shall (i) assess air monitoring data; (ii) determine whether health concerns exist at fumigation sites; and (iii) make recommendations, if necessary, to the fumigation services industry through appropriate trade groups and the Department of Environmental Quality as to whether additional preventative measures are needed to protect public health.”

§ 10.1-1308.1.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Streamlined permitting process for qualified energy generators.

As used in this section:“Biomass” means organic material that is available on a renewable or recurring basis, including:

Forest-related materials, including mill residues, logging residues, forest thinnings, slash, brush, low-commercial value materials or undesirable species, and woody material harvested for the purpose of forest fire fuel reduction or forest health and watershed improvement;

Agricultural-related materials, including orchard trees, vineyard, grain or crop residues, including straws, aquatic plants and agricultural processed co-products and waste products, including fats, oils, greases, whey, and lactose;

Animal waste, including manure and slaughterhouse and other processing waste;

Solid woody waste materials, including landscape trimmings, waste pallets, crates and manufacturing, construction, and demolition wood wastes, excluding pressure-treated, chemically treated or painted wood wastes and wood contaminated with plastic;

Crops and trees planted for the purpose of being used to produce energy;

Landfill gas, wastewater treatment gas, and biosolids, including organic waste byproducts generated during the wastewater treatment process; and

Municipal solid waste, excluding tires and medical and hazardous waste.“Expedited process” means a process that (i) requires the applicant to pay fees to the Commonwealth in connection with the issuance and processing of the permit application that do not exceed $50 and (ii) has a duration, from receipt of a complete permit application until final action by the Board or Department on the application, not longer than 60 days.“Qualified energy generator” means a commercial facility located in the Commonwealth with the capacity annually to generate no more than five megawatts of electricity, or produce the equivalent amount of energy in the form of fuel, steam, or other energy product, that is generated or produced from biomass, and that is sold to an unrelated person or used in a manufacturing process.

The Board shall develop an expedited process for issuing any permit that the Board is required to issue for the construction or operation of a qualified energy generator. The development of the expedited permitting process shall be in accordance with subdivision A 8 of § 2.2-4006; however, if the construction or operation of a qualified energy generator is subject to a major new source review program required by § 110(a)(2)(C) of the federal Clean Air Act, this section shall not apply.

History.

2008, c. 258; 2010, c. 65.

Editor’s note.

As to § 110(a)(2)(C) of the federal Clean Air Act, see 42 U.S.C.S. § 7410(a)(2)(C).

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 65 substituted “subdivision A 8” for “subdivision A 9” in the paragraph defining “Qualified energy generator.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 deleted “Board or” preceding “Department” in subsection A in the definition of “Expedited process”; and in subsection B, substituted “The Department” for “The Board” and substituted “it” for “the Board.”

§ 10.1-1308.1.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Streamlined permitting process for qualified energy generators.

As used in this section:

“Biomass” means organic material that is available on a renewable or recurring basis, including:

Forest-related materials, including mill residues, logging residues, forest thinnings, slash, brush, low-commercial value materials or undesirable species, and woody material harvested for the purpose of forest fire fuel reduction or forest health and watershed improvement;

Agricultural-related materials, including orchard trees, vineyard, grain or crop residues, including straws, aquatic plants and agricultural processed co-products and waste products, including fats, oils, greases, whey, and lactose;

Animal waste, including manure and slaughterhouse and other processing waste;

Solid woody waste materials, including landscape trimmings, waste pallets, crates and manufacturing, construction, and demolition wood wastes, excluding pressure-treated, chemically treated or painted wood wastes and wood contaminated with plastic;

Crops and trees planted for the purpose of being used to produce energy;

Landfill gas, wastewater treatment gas, and biosolids, including organic waste byproducts generated during the wastewater treatment process; and

Municipal solid waste, excluding tires and medical and hazardous waste.

“Expedited process” means a process that (i) requires the applicant to pay fees to the Commonwealth in connection with the issuance and processing of the permit application that do not exceed $50 and (ii) has a duration, from receipt of a complete permit application until final action by the Department on the application, not longer than 60 days.

“Qualified energy generator” means a commercial facility located in the Commonwealth with the capacity annually to generate no more than five megawatts of electricity, or produce the equivalent amount of energy in the form of fuel, steam, or other energy product, that is generated or produced from biomass, and that is sold to an unrelated person or used in a manufacturing process.

The Department shall develop an expedited process for issuing any permit that it is required to issue for the construction or operation of a qualified energy generator. The development of the expedited permitting process shall be in accordance with subdivision A 8 of § 2.2-4006; however, if the construction or operation of a qualified energy generator is subject to a major new source review program required by § 110(a)(2)(C) of the federal Clean Air Act, this section shall not apply.

History.

2008, c. 258; 2010, c. 65; 2022, c. 356.